Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 1. State Museum and Natural and Cultural History Repositories.

Sec. 14.57.010.
The state museum.

The department shall manage and have complete charge of all of the property contained in the institution known as the state museum. The museum is designated as a repository of natural and cultural history collections and shall be operated and maintained as a designated repository in the state capital. Branch museums may be established and maintained in other localities in the state.

The department shall

acquire artifacts, natural history specimens, art objects, etc., that pertain to the human and natural history of Alaska by purchase and by gift;

identify, catalog, preserve, and display these acquisitions;

acquire and catalog Alaskan photographs and maintain a card catalog of this collection;

accept endowments, grants, and gifts in accordance with AS 37.07 (the Executive Budget Act);

collect and maintain books, periodicals, pamphlets, and other materials pertinent to museum administration, techniques, and collections;

assist and advise in the development of local museums;

collect and keep current information concerning museum activities throughout the state;

coordinate the museum activities of the state with those of other agencies;

keep the museum open at reasonable hours for the convenience of visitors;

provide museum services and administer state and other grants-in-aid to museums in the state to supplement and improve their services, the grants to be paid from money appropriated for that purpose, or from other money available for that purpose.

The department may establish by regulation, and collect, reasonable user fees and other fees for services provided by the department under this chapter. The department may negotiate reduced fees or group discounts with, or offer reduced fees or group discounts to, persons who bring groups of people to visit the museum or a branch of the museum.

History.

(E.O. No. 34 (1974); am § 27 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 17 ch 36 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 100 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 21 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For fees, see 4 AAC 58, art. 1.

For museum assistance grants, see 4 AAC 58, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 15, 2014, in (a), rewrote the second sentence, which read, “The museum shall be maintained in the state capital.”

Sec. 14.57.012.
Designated natural and cultural history repositories.

The department may designate natural and cultural history repositories in addition to the state museum as provided under this section.

An institution located in the state that seeks designation as a natural and cultural history repository may apply on a form and under procedures established by the department in regulation. The procedures must include submission of evidence acceptable to the department that the institution

adheres to currently established criteria of collection preservation and storage, including employment of long-term, professional, and systematic curatorial services;

ensures public access commensurate with the nature of the objects of the collection in the repository;

has a statewide scope of collection;

has a statewide scope of knowledge dissemination;

maintains a museum certification issued by a nationally recognized entity;

complies with 25 U.S.C. 3001 — 3013 (Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation Act); and

meets other standards established in regulation by the department.

The department shall maintain a list of designated repositories.

A repository may accept and expend funds from any available source, including federal and state grants and donations, for the purpose of acquiring, cataloging, curating, and preserving state natural and cultural history collections.

A designation of a repository confers no acquisition, management, or other rights to the department over the collections held by a designated repository.

In this section, “institution” means a museum, a cultural center, or an affiliated research component of a museum or cultural center.

History.

(§ 2 ch 21 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 21, SLA 2014, which enacted this section, took effect September 15, 2014.

Sec. 14.57.015.
Accounting and disposition of receipts. [Repealed, § 92 ch 36 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 14.57.020.
Museum Collections Advisory Committee.

There is created in the department the State Museum Collections Advisory Committee consisting of five members appointed by the board to serve at the board’s pleasure for staggered three-year terms. The appointees shall be broadly representative of the public’s interest in the preservation of the human, cultural, natural, archeological, and anthropological history of Alaska. When possible, some of the committee members shall be known for, or possess, special expertise or a culturally relevant background in these aspects of the art and history of the state.

A member appointed to fill a vacancy serves for the unexpired term of the member succeeded.

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 1974; am § 61 ch 6 SLA 1984)

Sec. 14.57.030.
Officers; meetings, rules of procedure, quorum.

The committee shall elect a chairman from among its members.

The committee shall meet at least once every six months and at the call of its chair, on petition of a majority of its members, or at the call of the commissioner, or the director of the museum, at a mutually convenient time and place both for the members of the committee and for interested members of the public. A meeting of the committee may be held by teleconference.

The committee shall adopt rules of procedure to govern its meetings. A majority of the members of the committee constitutes a quorum.

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 1974; am § 4 ch 43 SLA 1994)

Sec. 14.57.040.
Compensation; per diem, travel expenses.

The members of the committee serve without compensation, but they are entitled to per diem and travel expenses as authorized by law for boards and commissions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 1974)

Cross references. —

For per diem and travel for boards and commissions, see AS

39.20.180

.

Sec. 14.57.050.
Collections management; acquisitions and dispositions.

On recommendation of the committee, the department shall adopt regulations governing the museum’s in-house acquisitions committee, and the management and disposition of artifacts, natural history specimens, art objects, collections or other items, materials, or properties that are owned by, in the custody of, or are proposed for acquisition by, the state museum. The regulations must be consistent with AS

14.57.200

—

14.57.290

.

Artifacts, natural history specimens, art objects, collections, or other items, materials, or properties that relate to the history of Alaska and are appropriate for preservation in the state museum of a value of $5,000 or more may not be acquired by purchase, gift, or exchange, or otherwise nor may any item owned by, or in the custody of, the state museum be disposed of by sale, gift, exchange, or otherwise, without the written approval of the committee. In recommending the acquisition or disposal of an item under this subsection for the state museum, the committee shall evaluate the need for the item or collection proposed for acquisition or disposal with reference to the scope of collections of the state museums.

The committee may obtain an independent, professional appraisal of the value of each item to be acquired or disposed of by or for the state museum.

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 1974; am § 2 ch 82 SLA 1992; am § 5 ch 43 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 122 SLA 2000)

Sec. 14.57.060.
Advisory duties.

The committee shall act in an advisory capacity to the board as to the general acquisition and deaccession policies and programs of the state museum.

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 1974; am § 6 ch 43 SLA 1994)

Sec. 14.57.070.
Conflict of interest.

A member of the committee may not act on a matter relating to the state museum in which the member’s relationship with another person or with respect to the acquisition or disposition of an item owned by, in custody of, or proposed to be acquired by or for the state museum creates a conflict of interest. A committee member may not

have a pecuniary or property interest in an item that is proposed to be acquired or disposed of by or for the state museum;

have a pecuniary or property interest, directly or indirectly, in a contract to which the museum, or the state on behalf of the museum, is a party; or

receive compensation for services rendered to the state museum as a consultant, expert, appraiser, or otherwise, except as provided in AS

14.57.040

.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a committee member may bequeath or donate an item to the state museum.

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 1974)

Sec. 14.57.080.
Definition.

In AS

14.57.020

—

14.57.080

, “committee” means the state Museum Collections Advisory Committee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 1974; am § 3 ch 82 SLA 1992)